Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-644
Cancer registry; Department of Health and Human Services; establish and maintain; information released.

The department shall establish and maintain a cancer registry that includes a record of the cases of cancer that occur within the state and such information concerning these cases which the department determines necessary and appropriate to provide a basic source of information to further scientific and medical research for the prevention, cure, and control of cancer. Any information released from the registry shall be disclosed as Class I, Class II, Class III, and Class IV data as provided in sections 81-663 to 81-675.

Laws 1982, LB 212, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 70;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 115.